Idaho statutes. Title 70 WATERCOURSES AND PORT DISTRICTS
Chapter 3
SNAKE RIVER IMPROVEMENTS

Sec.

§ 70-301. River improvements on Snake River. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 70-302. Commission created — Members

Compensation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 70-303. Termination of commission upon completion of improvements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 70-304. Duties of commissioner of reclamation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 70-305. Letting work by contract to bidders

Bond. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 70-306. Cost of engineering work a charge against funds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.